Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.160

Damage prevention account.

The damage prevention account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys directed by law or the commission to be deposited to the account must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for purposes designated in RCW 19.122.170. Only the commission or the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2011 c 263 s 12.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.